Hawaii statutes.
§237-16.5 Tax on written real property
leases; deduction allowed. (a) This section relates to the leasing of
real property by a lessor to a lessee. There is hereby levied, and shall be
assessed and collected annually, a privilege tax against persons engaging or
continuing within the State in the business of leasing real property to
another, equal to four per cent of the gross proceeds or gross income received
or derived from the leasing; provided that where real property is subleased by
a lessee to a sublessee, the lessee, as provided in this section, shall be
allowed a deduction from the amount of gross proceeds or gross income received
from its sublease of the real property. The deduction shall be in the amount
allowed under this section.

All deductions under this section and the name
and general excise tax number of the lessee's lessor shall be reported on the
general excise tax return. Any deduction allowed under this section shall only
be allowed with respect to leases and subleases in writing and relating to the
same real property.

(b) The lessee shall obtain from its lessor a
certificate, in the form as the department shall prescribe, certifying that the
lessor is subject to tax under this chapter on the gross proceeds or gross
income received from the lessee. The absence of the certificate in itself
shall give rise to the presumption that the lessee is not allowed the deduction
under this section.

(c) If various real property or space leased
to the lessee have different rental values, then the total monetary gross
proceeds or gross income paid to a lessor for all real property or space shall
first be allocated to the fair rental value for each real property or space.
If the lessee leases less than one hundred per cent of real property or space
that was leased from the lessor to a sublessee, then the total monetary gross
proceeds or gross income paid by the lessee for that real property or space to
its lessor shall be allocated. The percentage of real property or space
subleased shall be multiplied by the monetary gross proceeds or gross income
paid for the real property or space by the lessee to its lessor. The product
of the preceding multiplication shall be deducted from the monetary gross
proceeds or gross income received for real property or space by the lessee.

Once the allocations are made, the appropriate
deduction under subsection (g) shall be made.

(d) The lessor shall make allocations under
this section at the time the sublease is entered into and the allocations shall
not be changed during the term of the sublease. There shall be a reasonable
basis for the allocations, taking into consideration the size, quality, and
location of the real property or space subleased. In no event shall the total
amount allocated to all subleases exceed the total monetary gross proceeds paid
by the lessee to its lessor. The director may redetermine the amount of the
deduction under this section if the director finds that the basis for
allocation is not reasonable or that redetermination is necessary to prevent
the avoidance of taxes.

(e) As used in this section:

"Lease" means the rental of real
property under an instrument in writing by which one conveys real property for
a specified term and for a specified consideration, and includes the written
extension or renegotiation of a lease, and any holdover tenancy.

"Lessee" means one who holds real
property under lease, and includes a sublessee.

"Lessor" means one who conveys real
property by lease, and includes a sublessor.

"Real property or space" means the
area actually rented and used by the lessee, and includes common elements as
defined in section 514A-3 or 514B-3.

"Sublease" includes the rental of
real property which is held under a lease and is made in a written document by
which one conveys real property for a specified term and for a specified
consideration. A sublease includes the written extension or renegotiation of a
sublease and any holdover tenancy under the written sublease.

"Sublessee" means one who holds real
property under a sublease.

"Sublessor" means one who conveys
real property by sublease.

(f) This section shall not cause the tax upon
a lessor, with respect to any item of the lessor's gross proceeds or gross
income, to exceed four per cent.

(g) After allocation under subsection (c), if
necessary, the deduction under this section shall be allowed from the gross
proceeds or gross income of the lessee received from its sublease in an amount
calculated by multiplying the gross proceeds or gross income paid by the lessee
to its lessor for the lease of the real property by .875.

The amount calculated shall be deducted by the
lessee from the lessee's total reported gross proceeds or gross income. The
deduction allowed by this subsection may be taken by the fiscal and calendar
year lessees. [L 1997, c 353, §2; am L 2004, c 164, §§6, 35(5); am L 2005, c
93, §7; am L 2008, c 28, §4; am L 2015, c 22, §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next